Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 12.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-304
Commissioner
of Education; qualifications.

The Commissioner
of Education shall (1)(a) be a person of superior
educational attainments, (b) have had many years of
experience, (c) have demonstrated personal
and professional leadership in the administration of public education, and (d) be eligible to qualify for the highest grade
of school administrator certificate currently issued in the state or (2) possess a combination of education,
skills, administrative experiences in public education, and other such qualifications
as determined by the State Board of Education.

Laws 1953, c. 320, § 11, p. 1059;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-331;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 132;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 12.